nl: Materiaalvorm geurkunst: Kralen; Kristallen; Vlokken; Granulaat; Vloeistof; Pasta; Pellets; Poeder; Hars; Vast blok; Overige
th: รูปแบบวัสดุในศิลปะแห่งกลิ่น: ลูกปัด; คริสตัล; เกล็ด; เม็ดแกรนูล; ของเหลว; เนื้อเพสต์; เม็ด; ผง; เรซิน; บล็อกแข็ง; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Oblik materijala za olfaktornu umjetnost: Perlice; Kristali; Pahuljice; Granule; Tekućina; Pasta; Peleti; Prah; Smola; Kruti blok; Ostalo
ko: 후각 예술 소재 형태: 비즈; 크리스털; 플레이크; 과립; 액상; 페이스트; 펠릿; 파우더; 레진; 솔리드 블록; 기타
el: Μορφή υλικού για τις οσφρητικές τέχνες: Χάντρες; Κρύσταλλοι; Νιφάδες; Κόκκοι; Υγρό; Πάστα; Πέλετ; Σκόνη; Ρητίνη; Συμπαγές μπλοκ; Άλλο
bg-BG: Форма на материалите за олфактивно изкуство: Мъниста; Кристали; Люспи; Гранули; Течност; Паста; Пелети; Прах; Смола; Твърдо блокче; Друго
sk-SK: Forma vonného materiálu: Korálky; Kryštály; Vločky; Granule; Tekutina; Pasta; Pelety; Prášok; Živica; Pevný blok; Iná
vi: Định dạng chất liệu nghệ thuật khứu giác: Hạt; Tinh thể; Vảy; Cốm; Chất lỏng; Dạng bột nhão; Dạng viên; Dạng bột; Nhựa resin; Khối rắn; Khác
nb: Format for materiale til luktkunst: Perler; Krystaller; Flak; Granulat; Væske; Pasta; Pellets; Pulver; Harpiks; Fast blokk; Annet
es: Forma del material para artes olfativas: Cuentas; Cristales; Escamas; Gránulos; Líquido; Pasta; Pellets; Polvo; Resina; Bloque sólido; Otro
pt-PT: Formato do material das artes olfativas: Contas; Cristais; Flocos; Grânulos; Líquido; Pasta; Pellets; Pó; Resina; Bloco sólido; Outro
zh-CN: 嗅觉艺术材料形态: 珠状; 晶状; 片状; 颗粒状; 液体; 膏状; 丸状; 粉状; 树脂; 固体块状; 其他
de: Materialart zur Duftherstellung: Perlen; Kristalle; Flocken; Granulat; Flüssigkeit; Paste; Pellets; Pulver; Harz; Fester Block; Sonstige
zh-TW: 嗅覺藝術材質形式: 珠狀; 晶體; 片狀; 顆粒狀; 液態; 膏狀; 丸狀; 粉末; 樹脂; 固體塊狀; 其他
sl-SI: Oblika materiala za olfaktorne umetnosti: Kroglice; Kristali; Kosmiči; Zrnca; Tekočina; Pasta; Peleti; Prah; Smola; Trden blok; Drugo
en: Olfactory arts material form: Beads; Crystals; Flakes; Granules; Liquid; Paste; Pellets; Powder; Resin; Solid block; Other
it: Forma del materiale per le arti olfattive: Perle; Cristalli; Scaglie; Granuli; Liquido; Pasta; Pellet; Polvere; Resina; Blocco solido; Altro
fi: Hajuaistia hyödyntävän taiteen materiaalien muoto: Helmet; Kristallit; Hiutaleet; Rakeet; Neste; Tahna; Pelletit; Jauhe; Hartsi; Kiinteä lohko; Muu
ja: 嗅覚芸術素材フォーム: ビーズ; クリスタル; フレーク; 顆粒; 液体; ペースト; ペレット; パウダー; 樹脂; 固形ブロック; その他
lt-LT: Uoslės lavinimo medžiagų forma: Karoliukai; Kristalai; Dribsniai; Granulės; Skystis; Pasta; Peletės; Milteliai; Derva; Kietas blokas; Kita
pt-BR: Forma do material para perfumaria: Contas; Cristais; Flocos; Grânulos; Líquido; Pasta; Pellets; Pó; Resina; Bloco sólido; Outros
cs: Forma materiálu pro čichové umění: Kuličky; Krystaly; Vločky; Granule; Kapalina; Pasta; Pelety; Prášek; Pryskyřice; Pevný blok; Ostatní
sv: Olfaktoriska hobbymaterial: Pärlor; Kristaller; Flingor; Granulat; Vätska; Pasta; Pellets; Pulver; Harts; Fast block; Övrigt
ro-RO: Formă a materialului pentru arte olfactive: Mărgele; Cristale; Fulgi; Granule; Lichid; Pastă; Pelete; Pudră; Rășină; Bloc solid; Altele
da: Materialeform i olfaktorisk kunst: Perler; Krystaller; Flager; Granulat; Væske; Pasta; Piller; Pulver; Harpiks; Solid blok; Andet
fr: Formulaire de matériel pour les arts olfactifs: Perles; Cristaux; Flocons; Granulés; Liquide; Pâte; Pastilles; Poudre; Résine; Bloc solide; Autre
hu: Olfaktív művészeti anyag formája: Gyöngyök; Kristályok; Pelyhek; Granulátum; Folyadék; Paszta; Pelletek; Por; Gyanta; Szilárd tömb; Egyéb
ru: Форма материала для ольфакторного искусства: Шарики; Кристаллы; Хлопья; Гранулы; Жидкость; Паста; Пеллеты; Порошок; Смола; Твердый блок; Другое
tr: Olfaktör sanat malzemesi formu: Boncuklar; Kristaller; Pullar; Granüller; Sıvı; Macun; Peletler; Toz; Reçine; Katı blok; Diğer
pl: Forma materiałów do sztuki olfaktorycznej: Kulki; Kryształki; Płatki; Granulki; Płyn; Pasta; Pellet; Proszek; Żywica; Blok; Inne